Hawaii statutes.
§712-1201 Advancing prostitution; profiting
from prostitution; definition of terms. In sections 712-1202 and 712-1203:

(1) A person "advances prostitution" if,
acting other than as a prostitute or a patron of a prostitute, the person
knowingly causes or aids a person to commit or engage in prostitution, procures
or solicits patrons for prostitution, provides persons for prostitution
purposes, permits premises to be regularly used for prostitution purposes,
operates or assists in the operation of a house of prostitution or a
prostitution enterprise, or engages in any other conduct designed to institute,
aid, or facilitate an act or enterprise of prostitution.

(2) A person "profits from prostitution"
if, acting other than as a prostitute receiving compensation for
personally-rendered prostitution services, the person accepts or receives money
or other property pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any person
whereby the person participates or is to participate in the proceeds of
prostitution activity. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 145, §2]

Note

Section heading amended by L 2016, c 206, §13.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next